regression_test_data/sort/expected_output/bil.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 44
	Sdefs: 13
	Paradigms: 1
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -mon test/sample.eo-en.dix regression_test_data/sort/actual_output/bil.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="MF_GD">
  <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l><r></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l><r></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="m"/></l><r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <!-- ******************************
          group num_symbol
      ****************************** -->
<e>       <p><l>dek<b/>du<s n="num"/></l>              <r>twelve<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dek<b/>kvar<s n="num"/></l>            <r>fourteen<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dek<b/>kvin<s n="num"/></l>            <r>fifteen<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dek<b/>tri<s n="num"/></l>             <r>thirteen<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>dek<b/>unu<s n="num"/></l>             <r>eleven<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>du<s n="num"/></l>                     <r>two<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>dudek<s n="num"/></l>                  <r>twenty<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>kvar<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>four<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>kvardek<s n="num"/></l>                <r>forty<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>kvin<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>five<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>kvindek<s n="num"/></l>                <r>fifty<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    <!-- Numerals -->
<e>       <p><l>nulo<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>zero<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>tri<s n="num"/></l>                    <r>three<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>tridek<s n="num"/></l>                 <r>thirty<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unu<s n="num"/></l>                    <r>one<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <!-- ******************************
          group np_symbol
      ****************************** -->
<e>       <i>ABC<b/>News<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></i></e>
<e>       <i>Gerardo<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>

<e>       <i>Jaime<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>


<e>       <p><l>Manuelo<s n="np"/></l>                 <r>Manuel<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>Maria<s n="np"/></l>                   <r>María<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>Marta<s n="np"/></l>                   <r>Marta<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>Marteno<s n="np"/></l>                 <r>Martín<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <i>Paris<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>
<e>       <i>Robert<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>

<e>       <p><l>Zapatista<b/>Armeo<b/>de<b/>Nacia<b/>Liberiĝo<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></l><r>Zapatista<b/>National<b/>Liberation<b/>Army<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p></e>


    <!-- Nouns with gender in Esperanto but not in English -->

    <!-- ******************************
          group MF_GD
      ****************************** -->
<e>       <p><l>islamano<s n="n"/></l>                 <r>Muslim<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>katoliko<s n="n"/></l>                 <r>Catholic<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>kristano<s n="n"/></l>                 <r>Christian<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>protestanto<s n="n"/></l>              <r>Protestant<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
    <!-- ******************************
          group n_symbol
      ****************************** -->
<e lm="AT&quot;T" c="AT&quot;T"><p><l>AT&quot;T<s n="n"/></l><r>AT&quot;T<s n="n"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Some checks for special characters, like & and " -->
<e lm="AT&amp;T" c="AT&amp;T"><p><l>AT&amp;T<s n="n"/></l><r>AT&amp;T<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>felo<s n="n"/></l>                     <r>hide<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>supraĵo<s n="n"/></l>                  <r>face<s n="n"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>vizaĝo<s n="n"/></l>                   <r>face<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    <!-- ******************************
          group vblex_symbol
      ****************************** -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>defii<s n="vblex"/></l>                <r>face<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>domaĝi<s n="vblex"/></l>               <r>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>heziti<s n="vblex"/></l>               <r>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>kaŝi<s n="vblex"/></l>                 <r>hide<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>maleviti<s n="vblex"/></l>             <r>face<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>malvidigi<s n="vblex"/></l>            <r>hide<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>malvoli<s n="vblex"/></l>              <r>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Already is <e><l>unuavice<adv></l><r>primarily<adv></r></e>-->
    <!-- ******************************
          group adv_symbol
      ****************************** -->
<e i="yes"><p><l>ĉefe<s n="adv"/></l>                  <r>primarily<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Already is <e><l>ĉiaokaze<adv></l><r>regardless<adv></r></e>-->
<e r="LR" c="añadir también 'regardless of' como 'a pesar de'"><p><l>ĉiakoste<s n="adv"/></l><r>regardless<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ĉiusemajne<s n="adv"/></l>             <r>weekly<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
